src/morphology/affixes/regular_declinations.lexc
LEXICON ÜMBRIK     ! VVS 2 & 25; (productive)
                   ! forms may be based on 2 productive, i.e. stable types (aktiivne muuttüüp)
                   ! if prononunced as both syllables stressed, then like ELANIK 
                   ! if prononunced as only first syllable stressed, then like VIRSIK (Use/Rare)

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! ümbrik
     ! ELANIK
                                          ! sg nom has a single final stop instead of double, 
                                          ! so it has to be doubled to get the forms right
              :%{dbl%}%{sg.u%} 1C_SG ;         ! ümbriku etc

              :%{dbl%}e%{W%} N_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! NB! ümbrike etc
     +Use/Rare:%{dbl%}%{sg.u%}%>de N_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! ümbrikkude etc   
              :%{dbl%}%>%{pl.e%}%{sg.u%}%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;    ! ümbrikke; ümbrikkusid+Use/Rare???
              :%{dbl%} US_DERIVATION ;            ! ümbrikkus
              :%{dbl%}e%{W%}» IM_DERIVATION ;    ! ümbrikem
              :u%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;           ! ümbrikulik
     ! VIRSIK
     +Use/Rare:u%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! ümbrikut
     +Use/Rare:u%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! ümbrikuid
     +Use/Rare:u%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! ümbrikuil etc
     +Use/Rare:u»i IM_DERIVATION ;         ! ümbrikuim, ...
     +Use/Rare:u%>te N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! ümbrikute

LEXICON ÄMBLIK     ! VVS 2 & 25; (productive) = ÜMBRIK, but the less used forms are incorrect according to lang. norm
                   ! forms may be based on 2 productive, i.e. stable types (aktiivne muuttüüp)
                   ! if prononunced as both syllables stressed, then like ELANIK 
                   ! if prononunced as only first syllable stressed, then like VIRSIK (Use/Rare)

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! ämblik
     ! ELANIK
                                          ! sg nom has a single final stop instead of double, 
                                          ! so it has to be doubled to get the forms right
              :%{dbl%}%{sg.u%} 1C_SG ;         ! ämbliku etc

              :%{dbl%}e%{W%} N_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! NB! ämblike etc
     +Use/Rare:%{dbl%}%{sg.u%}%>de N_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! ämblikkude etc   
              :%{dbl%}%>%{pl.e%}%{sg.u%}%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;    ! ämblikke; ämblikkusid+Use/Rare???
              :%{dbl%} US_DERIVATION ;            ! ämblikkus
              :%{dbl%}e%{W%}» IM_DERIVATION ;    ! ämblikem
              :u%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;           ! ämblikulik
     ! VIRSIK
  +Use/NotNorm:u%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! ämblikut
  +Use/NotNorm:u%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! ämblikuid
  +Use/NotNorm:u%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! ämblikuil etc
  +Use/NotNorm:u»i IM_DERIVATION ;         ! ämblikuim, ...
  +Use/NotNorm:u%>te N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! ämblikute

LEXICON ARMEE    ! VVS 26 ; (productive) i.e. stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp)

              : 1V ;
              :%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! armeesse
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

! ---------------
! sub-paradigms common to several inflectional types
! ---------------

LEXICON NE_S_COMMON ! VVS 9, 10, 11, 12 common forms for affix -ne, -line, -s, -tus etc 

              :E1 N_SG_SUBPARA ;                
              :E1%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;         ! soolast, raudset, olulist
              :E1%>te N_PL_SUBPARA ;        
              :E1 US_DERIVATION ;
              :E1 SHORT_NE_STEM ;           ! nais-, vaatamis-, astraal-

LEXICON LINE_US_SPECIFIC   ! -line, -us ending words
              : LINE_US_NORM ;
              : LINE_US_RARE ;

LEXICON LINE_US_RARE  ! part of line_us_specific

     +Use/Rare:E1%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;          ! olulisesse, harjutusesse
     +Use/Rare:%>I1 N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;   ! olulisil, harjutusil etc

LEXICON LINE_US_NORM  ! part of line_us_specific

              :E1%>se SG_ILLATIVE ;           ! olulisse, harjutusse (haplology)
              :%>I1 PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! olulisi, harjutusi
              :»I1 IM_DERIVATION ;           ! olulisim
      
! ------

LEXICON 1C    ! consonant ending, stress NOT on penultimate syllable

                           ! NOMINATIVE is without stem vowel
              : 1C_SG ;    ! singular forms + pl nom
              : DE_PL ;

LEXICON 1V    ! vowel ending, stress on the last syllable

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! armee
              : N_SG_SUBPARA ;            ! armee etc
              :%>d SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! armeed
              :%>de N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! armeede etc  
              :%>%{s%}id PL_PAR_VARIANT ; ! armeesid; armeid...

LEXICON 2C    ! stress on penultimate syllable & word ends with a consonant; 
              ! or stressed penult. syllable extra heavy (e.g. -aania)  

                                          ! NOMINATIVE is without stem vowel
              :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! redelit, virsikut
              : 2C_STRONGPL ;             ! redeleid, redeleil etc

! in addition to Sg NOMINATIVE + 2C,
! a strengthening gradation paradigm may consist of either:
! 2C_LEMMA2 + 2C_STRONGPL, or 
! 2C_LEMMA3 + 2C_STRONG

LEXICON 2C_LEMMA2    ! subparadigm where 2 stems = lemma  

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;              ! ase, haare
              :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! aset, haaret

LEXICON 2C_LEMMA3    ! subparadigm where 3 stems = lemma  

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;              ! pinge
              :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! pinget
              :%>te N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! pingete etc

LEXICON 2C_STRONG    ! forms that would usually be in strong grade in strengthening gradation

              : N_SG_SUBPARA ;             ! redeli, kotka etc
              : SG_ILL_VARIANT ;           ! taskusse or tasku
              :%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! kotkaid
     +Use/Rare:%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! kotkail etc
              :»i IM_DERIVATION ;         ! magusaim, rentaableim, ...

LEXICON 2C_STRONGPL   ! forms that would sometimes be in strong grade in strengthening gradation

              : 2C_STRONG;                ! aseme, haarme etc
              :%>te N_PL_SUBPARA ;        ! asemete, haarmete

! LEXICON 2V    ! stress on penultimate syllable, word ends with vowel 
!              ! & stressed syllable NOT extra heavy (kava, sõda, pere)
!
!              :%{WL%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! kava, sõja etc
!                                        ! PARTITIVE is +0 or +t
!              : 2V_ILLATIVE ;
!              : DE_PL ;

LEXICON 1C_SG    ! SG subpara of 1C

              :%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! koti etc
              : SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! kotti
              : 1C_ILLATIVE ;          ! kotti, kotisse

LEXICON DE_PL    ! PL subpara of TAUD, KAVA, PERE

              :%>de N_PL_SUBPARA ;     ! kottide etc
                                       ! pl par stem vowel (u, i, 0) is often lexically determined 
                                       ! and usage-wise tagged
              :%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;   ! kingi, kingasid+Use/Rare vs. puudi+Use/Rare,
                                                    ! puudasid; kavu, kavasid; sõdu, sõdasid

! ---------------
! rules of analogy
! (cases grouped in various ways, for combining in different paradigms)
! ---------------

LEXICON N_SG_SUBPARA    ! sg gen + sg cases depending on it + pl nom; excl sg ill

       +Pl+Nom:%>d PL_NOM_GI ;
              : SG_GEN_ET_AL ;

LEXICON N_PL_SUBPARA    ! pl gen + pl cases depending on it 

           +Pl: STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;

LEXICON STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL    ! genitive and cases depending on it (either sg or pl)
                              ! incl. sse-illative 
              : GENITIVE ; 
              : STANDARD_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON SG_GEN_ET_AL          ! sg genitive and sg cases depending on it (either sg or pl)
                              ! NB! excl. sg illative 
              : SG_GENITIVE ; 
           +Sg: REGULAR_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON STANDARD_SEM_CASES    ! semantic cases, incl sse-illative

              :%>sse ILLATIVE ;
              : REGULAR_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON REGULAR_SEM_CASES    ! semantic cases, excl illative

              : REGULAR_LOCATIVES ;
              :%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
              : NINATAGA ;

LEXICON NINATAGA

              :%>ni TERMINATIVE ;	
              :%>na ESSIVE ;	
              :%>ta ABESSIVE ;	
              :%>ga COMITATIVE ;

	
LEXICON N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA    ! pl cases depending on vowel plural gen  
                              ! excl. ni-na-ta-ga ?
           +Pl: LOCATIVES ;
           +Pl: NINATAGA ;    ! incl. ni-na-ta-ga

LEXICON LOCATIVES            

              : STANDARD_LOCATIVES ;
              :%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;

LEXICON STANDARD_LOCATIVES            

              :%>sse ILLATIVE ;
              : REGULAR_LOCATIVES ;

LEXICON REGULAR_LOCATIVES            

              :%>s INESSIVE ;
              :%>st ELATIVE ;
              :%>le ALLATIVE ;	
              :%>l ADESSIVE ;	
              :%>lt ABLATIVE ;	

! -----------
! individual cases
! -----------

LEXICON 1C_ILLATIVE       ! sse-illative is very rare;
              : SG_ILLATIVE ;              ! kotti
      +Use/Hyp:%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! kotisse

! LEXICON 2V_ILLATIVE       ! sse-illative is the default; few words have the short form also
!              :%{S%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;     ! kavva
!              :%{WL%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;    ! kavasse 

! the preferred form for Pl Par and Sg Ill is indicated in the stem lexicon
! (not in the continuation lexicon)
! so these variants allow us to carry the info from stem lex to the final surface form

LEXICON PL_PAR_VARIANT    ! for TAUD, PIIM, KOON etc types

     +Use/Rare:%{rare%} PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! less used pl par form for that word
              : PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! default pl par form for that word

LEXICON SG_ILL_VARIANT    ! for KEEL etc types

     +Use/Rare:%>%{s%}%{s%}%{e%}%{rare%} SG_ILLATIVE ;  ! less used sg ill form for that word
              :%>%{s%}%{s%}%{e%} SG_ILLATIVE ;          ! default sg ill form for that word

! -------- these cases are (often) non-predictable from Sg Nom

LEXICON SG_NOMINATIVE
           +Sg:%{no.apo%} NOMINATIVE ;
              : LANE_DERIVATION ;
              : IST_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON SG_GENITIVE
           +Sg: GENITIVE ;
              : KE_DERIVATION ;
              : LINE_DERIVATION ;
              : M_DERIVATION ;
              : LT_DERIVATION ;
              : STI_DERIVATION ;
              : INI_DERIVATION ;
              : TI_DERIVATION ;
              : NNA_DERIVATION ;
              : KAS_DERIVATION ;
              : NE_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON SG_PARTITIVE
           +Sg: PARTITIVE ;

LEXICON SG_ILLATIVE
           +Sg: ILLATIVE ;

LEXICON PL_PARTITIVE
           +Pl: PARTITIVE ;

! --------- the 14 individual cases ------------
!! flag diacritics can be used for remembering the case 

LEXICON NOMINATIVE
          +Nom: NOM_GI ;

LEXICON GENITIVE
          +Gen: GEN_GI ;

LEXICON PARTITIVE
          +Par: PAR_GI ;	

LEXICON ILLATIVE
          +Ill: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON INESSIVE
          +Ine: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ELATIVE
          +Ela: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ALLATIVE
          +All: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ADESSIVE
          +Ade: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ABLATIVE
          +Abl: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON TRANSLATIVE
          +Tra: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON TERMINATIVE
          +Trm: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ESSIVE
          +Ess: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ABESSIVE
          +Abe: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON COMITATIVE
          +Com: SEM_GI ;	

!! flag diacritics are used for remembering the case for compounding; 
!! not all the cases must be distinguished

LEXICON NOM_GI
  @P.Case.Nom@ GI ;

LEXICON GEN_GI
  @P.Case.Gen@ GI ;

LEXICON PAR_GI
  @P.Case.Par@ GI ;

LEXICON SEM_GI     ! semantic (aka oblique) case
  @P.Case.Sem@ GI ;

LEXICON PL_NOM_GI       ! in compounding, +Pl is relevant for +Nom only
  @P.Case.PlNom@ GI ;

! paradigmatic derivation, i.e. very regular

LEXICON M_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.m@ M_DERIVATION_SUF ;
